Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 6

Cost Principles and Audits

12-3-601. Cost or pricing data.

A contractor who makes a contract with the state under this chapter shall, except as provided in subsection (c), submit cost or pricing data, and shall certify that, to the best of its knowledge and belief, the cost of pricing data submitted was accurate, complete, and current as of a mutually determined specified date prior to the date of:

The pricing of any contract awarded pursuant to sole source procurement authority pursuant to § 12-3-504, where the total contract price is expected to exceed an amount established by the procurement commission; or

The pricing of any change order or contract modification which is expected to exceed an amount established by the procurement commission.

Any contract, change order, or contract modification under which a certificate is required shall contain a provision that the price to the state, including profit or fee, shall be adjusted to exclude any significant sums by which the state finds that such price was increased because the contractor-furnished cost or pricing data was inaccurate, incomplete, or not current as of the date agreed upon between the parties.

The requirements of this section need not be applied to contracts when:

The contract price is based on adequate price competition;

The contract price is based on established catalogue prices or market prices;

Contract prices are set by law or regulation; or

It is determined in writing in accordance with regulations promulgated by the procurement commission that the requirements of this section may be waived, and the reasons for such waiver are stated in writing.

Acts 1981, ch. 332, § 18; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19; 2013, ch. 403, § 35; T.C.A. §12-3-301.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 6, §§12-3-601 —12-3-612 was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 9 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 50-58, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 6 to title 12, ch. 3, part 9 and transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-602. Right to inspect plant or place of business and audit books and records.

The state may, at reasonable times, and subject to regulation of the procurement commission, inspect the part of the plant or place of business of a contractor or any subcontractor which is related to the performance of any contract awarded or to be awarded by the state.

The state may, at reasonable times and places, audit the books and records of any person who has submitted cost or pricing data to the extent that such books and records relate to such cost or pricing data. Any person who receives a contract, change order, or contract modification for which cost or pricing data are required, shall maintain such books and records that relate to such cost or pricing data for three (3) years from the date of final payment under the contract, unless a shorter period is otherwise authorized in writing.

The state shall be entitled to audit the books and records of a contractor or any subcontractor under any contract or subcontract other than a firm fixed-price contract, to the extent that such books and records relate to the performance of such contract or subcontract. Such books and records shall be maintained by the contractor for a period of three (3) years from the date of final payment under the prime contract and by the subcontractor for a period of three (3) years from the date of final payment under the subcontract, unless a shorter period is otherwise authorized in writing. All contracts after July 1, 2013, shall include a provision with this statutory requirement and the provision cannot be amended or removed without the written consent of the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1981, ch. 332, § 19; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19; 2013, ch. 403, § 36; T.C.A. §12-3-302.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 6, §§12-3-601 —12-3-612 was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 9 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 50-58, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 6 to title 12, ch. 3, part 9 and transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-603. Regulations regarding cost principles.

The chief procurement officer shall propose regulations for approval by the procurement commission setting forth cost principles which shall be used to determine the allowability of incurred costs for the purpose of reimbursing costs under contract provisions that provide for the reimbursement of costs; provided, that if a written determination is made by the chief procurement officer to justify such action, such cost principles may be modified by contract and reported to the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1981, ch. 332, § 20; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19; 2013, ch. 403, § 37; T.C.A. §12-3-303.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 6, §§12-3-601 —12-3-612 was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 9 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 50-58, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 35-37, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 6 to title 12, ch. 3, part 9 and transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 3 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.